Washington statutes.
RCW 1.80.020

Scope.

(1) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (2) of this section, this chapter applies to electronic records and electronic signatures relating to a transaction.

(2) This chapter does not apply to a transaction to the extent it is governed by:

(a) A law governing the creation and execution of wills, codicils, or testamentary trusts. However, this chapter applies to nonjudicial settlement agreements under RCW 11.96A.220; and

(b) Title 62A RCW other than RCW 62A.1-306 and chapters 62A.2 and 62A.2A RCW.

(3) This chapter applies to an electronic record or electronic signature otherwise excluded from the application of this chapter under subsection (2) of this section to the extent it is governed by a law other than those specified in subsection (2) of this section.

(4) A transaction subject to this chapter is also subject to other applicable substantive law.

[ 2024 c 188 s 17; 2020 c 57 s 3.]